Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.035

Response to complaint by more than one agency—Procedure—Written records.

(1) If the department or a law enforcement agency responds to a complaint of alleged child abuse or neglect and discovers that another agency has also responded to the complaint, the agency shall notify the other agency of their presence, and the agencies shall coordinate the investigation and keep each other apprised of progress.

(2) The department, each law enforcement agency, each county prosecuting attorney, each city attorney, and each court shall make as soon as practicable a written record and shall maintain records of all incidents of suspected child abuse reported to that person or agency.

(3) Every employee of the department who conducts an interview of any person involved in an allegation of abuse or neglect shall retain his or her original written records or notes setting forth the content of the interview unless the notes were entered into the electronic system operated by the department which is designed for storage, retrieval, and preservation of such records.

(4) Written records involving child sexual abuse shall, at a minimum, be a near verbatim record for the disclosure interview. The near verbatim record shall be produced within fifteen calendar days of the disclosure interview, unless waived by management on a case-by-case basis.

(5) Records kept under this section shall be identifiable by means of an agency code for child abuse.

[ 1999 c 389 s 7; 1997 c 386 s 26; 1985 c 259 s 3.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—1997 c 386: See notes following RCW 13.50.010.

Legislative findings—1985 c 259: See note following RCW 26.44.030.